lexc-files/derivational-suffixes/noun-suffixing/noun-derivSuffix_semiFinalE.txt
!======================================================
LEXICON NounPostbaseVII
!  noun-elaborating [NN] and verbalizing [NV] suffixes
!  when suffixing to noun roots that have semifinal -e
!======================================================

0:0  NounInflVII;

^~sf–ghhaleg(N→XCLM):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ghhalek    #;               ! how N! (exclamation)
^–lqusigh(N→PTCL):^%{.m.%}lqusiq                #;               ! all N; throughout the N; since last N; big N
^~sf-w%:(e)nkut(N→N):^%{.sf.%}enkut             Enclitic;        ! N and company (or family)
^~sf-w%:(e)nkuk(N→N):^%{.sf.%}enkuk             Enclitic;        ! N and partner (or spouse)
^+tuumagh*(N→QUANTQUAL):^tuumagh                QuantQualInfl;   ! together with one's Ns

^~fmii(N→N):^mii                                NounPostbaseI;   ! resident of N; inhabitant of N
^+ni(N→N):^ni                                   NounPostbaseI;   ! the smell of N; the odor of N; the taste of N
^–ghllag(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghllag                    NounPostbaseII;  ! big N; large N; lots of N
^–ghrugllag(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghrugllag              NounPostbaseII;  ! big N; large N
^–ghrug(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghrug                      NounPostbaseII;  ! big old N; poor old N
^–ghrukutaaghllag(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghrukutaaghllag  NounPostbaseII;  ! huge N; gigantic N
^–ghrupag(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghrupag                  NounPostbaseII;  ! darned old N
^–krag(N→N):^%{.m.%}krag                        NounPostbaseII;  ! fancy piece of of N
^–llaag(N→N):^%{.m.%}llaag                      NounPostbaseII;  ! crude N; clumsy N; bad N
^+llug(N→N):^llug                               NounPostbaseII;  ! poor quality N; bad N; undesirable N; N not in its ideal state
^–llug(N→N):^%{.m.%}llug                        NounPostbaseII;  ! poor quality N; bad N; undesirable N; N not in its ideal state
^–lug(N→N):^%{.m.%}lug                          NounPostbaseII;  ! old (in age) N
^~fmig(N→N):^mig                                NounPostbaseII;  ! thing held in one's N 
^–perug(N→N):^%{.m.%}perug                      NounPostbaseII;  ! one like N
^–pig(N→N):^%{.m.%}pig                          NounPostbaseII;  ! real N; genuine N; authentic N; old-fashioned N
^–qrug(N→N):^%{.m.%}qrug                        NounPostbaseII;  ! good old N; bad old N (paradoxically); troublesome N
^+raag(N→N):^raag                               NounPostbaseII;  ! thing like N
^–rraag(N→N):^%{.m.%}rraag                      NounPostbaseII;  ! crude N; clumsy N; bad N; shabby N; discarded N
^@kaghagh(N→N):^kagha%{g%}h                     NounPostbaseIII; ! small N
^~–kaghqagh(N→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kaghqa%{g%}h   NounPostbaseIII; ! something to be used as N; future N
^+kagh(N→N):^ka%{g%}h                           NounPostbaseIII; ! raw material for N
^~–kegtagh(N→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kegta%{g%}h     NounPostbaseIII; ! one with good N
^–kuvinghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}kuvingha%{g%}h        NounPostbaseIII; ! remains of N
^–lghutagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}lghuta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! place for N; container for N
^–llgagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}llga%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! one with small N; little one with N
^+lluggagh(N→N):^llugga%{g%}h                   NounPostbaseIII; ! dear little meek N
^–lluggagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}llugga%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! dear little meek N
^–lugpigagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}lugpiga%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII; ! fine old N
^–mleghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}mlegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N 
^–mreghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}mregha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–mzeghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}mzegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vleghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vlegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vreghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vregha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vzeghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vzegha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–ngeltagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}ngelta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^–ngertagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}ngerta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^–ngestagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}ngesta%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^~(ng)iitagh(N→N):^%{.sf.%}iita%{g%}h           NounPostbaseIII; ! protective device for or like N
^~f(p/v)allugh(N→N):^pallu%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! one with big N; mostly N
^–peragh(N→N):^%{.m.%}pera%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; makeshift N; not quite correct N
^+qagh(N→N):^qa%{g%}h                           NounPostbaseIII; ! one to the N
^–qinghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}qingha%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! thing of N
^–qragh(N→N):^%{.m.%}qra%{g%}h                  NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; thing like N
^+qutagh(N→N):^quta%{g%}h                       NounPostbaseIII; ! device associated with N
^+raghagh(N→N):^ragha%{g%}h                     NounPostbaseIII; ! brand new N
^+raaghagh(N→N):^raagha%{g%}h                   NounPostbaseIII; ! new N
^–sluvegagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}sluvega%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII; ! little N
^–sngwaaghagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}sngwaagha%{g%}h      NounPostbaseIII; ! tiny N; very small N; very little N
^–squllgagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}squllga%{g%}h          NounPostbaseIII; ! one with small N
^–squgh(N→N):^%{.m.%}squ%{g%}h                  NounPostbaseIII; ! small N; little N
^+tagh(N→N):^ta%{g%}h                           NounPostbaseIII; ! the N part of something; thing of N; acquired N; caught N
^+tuqagh(N→N):^tuqa%{g%}h                       NounPostbaseIII; ! one that has lots of N
^–tuqagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}tuqa%{g%}h                NounPostbaseIII; ! one that has lots of N
^–ghhagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghhagh                   NounPostbaseIV;  ! little N; small N; bit of N
^–ghnaggagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghnaggagh             NounPostbaseIV;  ! big N
^~–kenghhagh*(N→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}kenghhagh    NounPostbaseIV;  ! newly made or newly acquired N
^–linghagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}linghagh               NounPostbaseIV;  ! thing of N
^–llegagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}llegagh                 NounPostbaseIV;  ! crudely made N 
^–msuggagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}msuggagh               NounPostbaseIV;  ! no N; virtually no N
^~%:(ng)inagh*(N→N):^%{.sf.%}inagh              NounPostbaseIV;  ! only N; just N; exactly N
^–qligh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}qligh                     NounPostbaseIV;  ! thing that is far to the N direction
^–raaghinagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}raaghinagh           NounPostbaseIV;  ! nothing but N; just N; only N
^–squghhagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}squghhagh             NounPostbaseIV;  ! very small N; very little N; tiny N
^–staghhiinagh*(N→N):^%{.m.%}staghhiinagh       NounPostbaseIV;  ! only N; each one an N 
^–ghrukutaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}ghrukutaagh          NounPostbaseV;   ! big N; large N; huge N
^~–(ghw/ngw/w)aagh(N→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ghwaagh NounPostbaseV;   ! imitation N; artificial N; model N; toy N; pretend N; little bit of N or little thing like N; thing like N
^+kwaagh(N→N):^kwaagh                           NounPostbaseV;   ! leftover N
^~fmiigh(N→N):^miigh                            NounPostbaseV;   ! thing held in one's N
^–mlaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}mlaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–mraagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}mraagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–mzaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}mzaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vlaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vlaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vraagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vraagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–vzaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vzaagh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! little bit of N or little thing like N
^–msiigh(N→N):^%{.m.%}msiigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! something like N
^–penaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}penaagh                  NounPostbaseV;   ! homely N; shabby N; dilapidated N; ugly N
^–perewaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}perewaagh              NounPostbaseV;   ! all, only or totally N
^–pestaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}pestaagh                NounPostbaseV;   ! truly N
^–raagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}raagh                      NounPostbaseV;   ! new-fangled N (as opposed to traditional style N); modern N
^–siigh(N→N):^%{.m.%}siigh                      NounPostbaseV;   ! to get lots of N; to gather lots of N
^–vyiigh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vyiigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! crude N; makeshift N
^–vziigh(N→N):^%{.m.%}vziigh                    NounPostbaseV;   ! crude N; makeshift N
^–yaagh(N→N):^%{.m.%}yaagh                      NounPostbaseV;   ! short or small N (article of clothing)
^–lghute(N→N):^%{.m.%}lghu%{t%}e                NounPostbaseVI;  ! lots of N; a number of N; several N; a group of N
^–lgute(N→N):^%{.m.%}lgu%{t%}e                  NounPostbaseVI;  ! one with the same N
^–leg(N→N):^%{.m.%}leg                          NounPostbaseVII; ! one having N; one with N
^+yage(N→N):^yage                               NounPostbaseVIII; ! multitude of N; abundance of N; lots of N

^–ghqu(N→V):^%{.m.%}ghqu                   VerbPostbaseI;   ! to go to get N or to get something from N
^––ii(N→V):^%{.mm.%}ii                     VerbPostbaseI;   ! to cut up N; to butcher N; to prepare N 
^–lgu(N→V):^%{.m.%}lgu                     VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have an Nor have N-s; to possess N
^~%:(ng)u(N→V):^%{.sf.%}u                  VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be N; is N; for there to be N (weather condition)
^–pigu(N→V):^%{.m.%}pigu                   VerbPostbaseI;   ! to be very much an N
^+qu(N→V):^qu                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to hunt N; to hunt with (using) N
^+si(N→V):^si                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to work on or with N; to acquire lots of N; to get lots of N
^+ti(N→V):^ti                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to speak the language of N
^+tu(N→V):^tu                              VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have a lot of N 
^–tu(N→V):^%{.m.%}tu                       VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have a lot of N
^+tulli(N→V):^tulli                        VerbPostbaseI;   ! for it to be getting feasible to use N 
^+tutka(N→V):^tutka                        VerbPostbaseI;   ! to have N to an indicated degree
^––iqe(N→V):^%{.mm.%}iqe                   VerbPostbaseII;    ! to deal with N; to work with N; to have pain in one's N; to have trouble with one's N;
^~–ke(N→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ke              VerbPostbaseII;  ! have as one's N; object is subject's N; have N
^–liqe(N→V):^%{.m.%}liqe                   VerbPostbaseII;  ! to deal with N; to work with N; to have pain in one's N; to have trouble with one's N
^+lliqe(N→V):^lliqe                        VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble with one's N
^–lliqe(N→V):^%{.m.%}lliqe                 VerbPostbaseII;  ! to have trouble with one's N
^–nge(N→V):^%{.m.%}nge                     VerbPostbaseII;  ! to acquire N; to get N (permanently); to obtain N (permanently); to catch N (game)
^+te(N→V):^%{t%}e                          VerbPostbaseII;  ! to go to N; to catch N; to obtain N; to spend N (time)
^–ghraag(N→V):^%{.m.%}ghraag               VerbPostbaseIII; ! to be somewhat like N
^–ghrug(N→V):^%{.m.%}ghrug                 VerbPostbaseIII; ! big old one V-s 
^–lipag(N→V):^%{.m.%}lipag                 VerbPostbaseIII; ! to put in too much N
^~fmig(N→V):^mig                           VerbPostbaseIII; ! to hold in one's N; to put in one's N
^~%:(ng)isag(N→V):^%{.sf.%}isag            VerbPostbaseIII; ! to lack N; to need N
^~%:(ng)isug(N→V):^%{.sf.%}isug            VerbPostbaseIII; ! to have insufficient N
^+tupag(N→V):^tupag                        VerbPostbaseIII; ! to eat or use too much N
^+yag(N→V):^yag                            VerbPostbaseIII; ! for the number of N to increase
^@~fyug(N→V):^yug                          VerbPostbaseIII; ! to want some N
^––igh(N→V):^%{.mm.%}igh                   VerbPostbaseIV;  ! provide with N
